Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 6. Pedestrians' Rights and Duties

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8 Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 458 to 496.

Who is “pedestrian” with respect to rights given and duties imposed by traffic rules and regulations, 30 ALR2d 866.

Application of “assured clear distance ahead” or “radius of lights” doctrine to accident involving pedestrian crossing street or highway, 31 ALR2d 1424.

Contributory negligence of one standing in highway to attempt to warn approaching motorists of dangerous situation, 53 ALR2d 1002.

Contributory negligence, in motor vehicle accident case, of pedestrian under physical disability, 83 ALR2d 769.

Anti-hitchhiking laws: their construction and effect in action for injury to hitchhiker, 46 ALR3d 964.

Who is “pedestrian” entitled to rights and subject to duties provided by traffic regulations or judicially stated, 35 ALR4th 1117.

Sufficiency of evidence to raise last clear chance doctrine in cases of automobile collision with pedestrian or bicyclist—modern cases, 9 ALR5th 826.

60A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 771, 778 to 784.

§ 31-5-601.
Obedience to traffic-control devices; general privileges and restrictions.

A pedestrian shall obey the instructions of any official traffic-control device specifically applicable to him unless otherwise directed by a police officer.

Pedestrians are subject to traffic-control signals at intersections as provided by W.S.

31-5-403

and

31-5-404

.

At all other places pedestrians shall be accorded the privileges and are subject to the restrictions stated in this act.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 67; C.S. 1945, § 60-667; W.S. 1957, § 31-157; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

§ 31-5-602.
Right-of-way in crosswalks.

When traffic-control signals are not in place or not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way by slowing down or stopping if need be to yield, to any pedestrian within or entering a crosswalk at either edge of the roadway.

When traffic-control signals are not in place or not in operation at a school crosswalk, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian within or entering a school crosswalk at either edge of the roadway by slowing down or stopping.

No pedestrian shall suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply under the conditions stated in W.S. 31-5-603(b).

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the roadway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear shall not overtake and pass the stopped vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 68; C.S. 1945, § 60-668; W.S. 1957, § 31-158; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1986, ch. 66, § 1; 1993, ch. 42, § 1.

Pedestrian walking across highway without marked crosswalknegligent. —

A pedestrian who walks into the side of an approaching car while crossing a highway where there is no marked crosswalk and no intersection is guilty of negligence. Johnston v. Vukelic, 67 Wyo. 1, 213 P.2d 925,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1950).

But driver failing to keep lookout also negligent. —

The driver of a car is negligent in looking to the left instead of keeping a lookout ahead, as he approaches a place where a pedestrian is crossing the highway. Johnston v. Vukelic, 67 Wyo. 1, 213 P.2d 925,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1950).

Applied

in

Feltner v. Bishop, 348 P.2d 548,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 31-5-603.
Crossing at other than crosswalks.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic-control signals are in operation pedestrians shall not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

No pedestrian shall cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by official traffic-control devices. When authorized to cross diagonally, pedestrians shall cross only in accordance with the official traffic-control devices pertaining to the crossing movements.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 69; C.S. 1945, § 60-669; W.S. 1957, § 31-159; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Section not violated where person crosses between pedestriancrossing signs. —

Where the painted stripes defining the lane for pedestrians crossing have been obliterated, it cannot be said that this section is violated by a person crossing between pedestrian crossing signs which are readily visible to both motorists and pedestrians. Calkins v. Hamme, 387 F.2d 317, 1967 U.S. App. LEXIS 4088 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1967).

Applied

in

Feltner v. Bishop, 348 P.2d 548,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1960).

§ 31-5-604.
Use of right half of crosswalks.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 71; C.S. 1945, § 60-671; W.S. 1957, § 31-160; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-605.
Walking along roadways or highways.

Where a sidewalk is provided and its use is practicable it is unlawful for any pedestrian to walk along and upon an adjacent roadway.

Where sidewalks are not provided any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall, when practicable, walk only on the left side of the roadway or its shoulder facing traffic which may approach from the opposite direction as far as practicable from the edge of the roadway.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, any pedestrian upon a roadway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 72; C.S. 1945, § 60-672; W.S. 1957, § 31-161; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure to comply with statute regulating travel by pedestrian along highway as affecting right to recovery for injuries or death resulting from collision with automobile, 45 ALR3d 658.

§ 31-5-606.
Soliciting on streets and highways.

No person shall be on a highway for the purpose of soliciting employment, business or contributions from the occupant of any vehicle.

No person shall stand on or in proximity to a street or highway for the purpose of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about to be parked on a street or highway.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 73; C.S. 1945, § 60-673; W.S. 1957, § 31-162; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “a ride” following “purpose of soliciting,” and deleted the last sentence in (a).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and effect of anti-hitchhiking laws in action for injury to hitchhiker, 46 ALR3d 964.

§ 31-5-607.
Exercise of due care by drivers.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this act or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian or any person propelling a human powered vehicle and shall give an audible signal when necessary and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any obviously confused, incapacitated or intoxicated person.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 70; C.S. 1945, § 60-670; W.S. 1957, § 31-163; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Applied

in

Feltner v. Bishop, 348 P.2d 548,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1960).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Duty and liability with respect to giving audible signal upon approaching pedestrian, 24 ALR3d 183.

Motorist's liability for striking person lying in road, 41 ALR4th 303.

§ 31-5-608.
Driving through or within safety zone.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-609.
Right-of-way on sidewalks.

The driver of a vehicle crossing a sidewalk shall yield the right-of-way to any pedestrian and all other traffic on the sidewalk.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-610.
Yielding of right-of-way to authorized emergency vehicles.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle making use of an audible signal meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-5-952

and visual signals meeting the requirements of W.S.

31-5-928

, or of a police vehicle properly and lawfully making use of an audible signal only, every pedestrian shall yield the right-of-way to the authorized emergency vehicle.

This section shall not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway nor from the duty to exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-611.
Blind pedestrian right-of-way.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to any blind pedestrian carrying a clearly visible white cane or accompanied by a guide dog.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to design of curb ramps for blind pedestrians, see § 16-6-501(b).

§ 31-5-612.
Pedestrians under influence of alcohol or controlled substances.

A pedestrian who is under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance to a degree which renders himself a hazard shall not walk or be upon a highway.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1001

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Motorist's liability for striking person lying in road, 41 ALR4th 303.

§ 31-5-613.
Passing through railroad crossing gate or barrier.

No pedestrian shall pass through, around, over or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad grade crossing or bridge while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.